Washington statutes.
RCW 43.03.2705

Reports on stipends and allowances to class one group members.

(1) An agency exercising its authority to provide stipends under RCW 43.03.220(2) must report to the Washington state office of equity by August 30, 2023, and August 30, 2024, for state fiscal years 2023 and 2024 respectively, the following information:

(a) A brief description of the groups for which stipends have been made available including:

(i) Number of members receiving a stipend or allowance; and

(ii) Aggregate demographic information of members of class one groups including race, ethnicity, income, and geographic representation by county;

(b) The amount of stipends distributed;

(c) The amount of allowances distributed;

(d) An analysis of whether and how the availability of stipends and allowances has reduced barriers to participation and increased the diversity of group participants; and

(e) An analysis of whether the provision of stipends and allowances resulted in more applications and willingness to participate.

(2) The Washington state office of equity shall:

(a) Compile and analyze the information received from agencies under this section; and

(b) Prepare a report, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, to the governor and legislature by December 1, 2024. The report must include:

(i) An overall evaluation of the stipend process authorized in RCW 43.03.220(2);

(ii) Recommendations for improving the process; and

(iii) Recommendations to further decrease barriers to participation and increase the diversity of group applicants.

[ 2022 c 245 s 7.]

NOTES:

Findings—2022 c 245: See note following RCW 43.03.220.